Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Number of Reviews
23

Author
Greg King
BELOVED (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Jonathan Demme
Stars: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Lisa Gay Hamilton, Irma P Hall, Albert Hall, Beah Richards, Kessia
Kordelle, Jude Ciccolella, Jason Robards, Tracey Walter
Running time: 172 minutes.
In hindsight, maybe it wasn't such a good idea for Oprah
Winfrey to give up her day job.  America's queen of daytime television
talk shows has quit the small screen to establish a new career in
movies with Beloved, her first feature film since the memorable The
Colour Purple 14 years ago.  Based on Toni Morrison's acclaimed 1987
novel, Beloved has been something of a labour of love for Winfrey, who
has nurtured the project for over a decade.  However, this
disappointing film should have been much more powerful, especially
given the time and effort spent on refining and developing it.
The film tells of the hardships confronting former slaves as
they try to come to terms with their freedom and the costly legacy of
their recent blood soaked past.  This is rich territory we have
explored before, most notably in the epic tv series Roots.  Beloved is
an unsatisfactory and occasionally unfathomable mix of history, family
drama, horror, mysticism, and unexplained magic that fails to leave
such a lasting impression.
Set in the mid-1870's, the film centres around Sethe
(Winfrey), a former slave haunted by her past and the soul destroying
sacrifices she had to make to ensure her own survival.  Sethe lives in
the old family house on the outskirts of Cincinnati and is slowly
coming to terms with her independence.  She is shunned by most of the
townsfolk, for reasons that we only slowly learn about.  The scars of
the past also affect her daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise, from Set It
Off, etc), who is reluctant to leave the house.
The healing process begins with the arrival of two very
different people.  Paul D (Danny Glover) is a former slave and family
friend, who re-enters Sethe's life after 18 years.  He brings
happiness and love back into Sethe's life, until even her unassuaged
guilt proves too much.  The other catalyst is Beloved (Thandie Newton,
from Flirting, etc), a scarred and twisted young woman of mysterious
origins, whose presence in the house becomes both threatening and
unnerving.
This is the first film from Oscar winning director Jonathan
Demme (The Silence Of The Lambs, etc) since 1993's Philadelphia.
Although he handles the material with restraint, except for a couple
of notable exceptions, his direction seems to lack a strong focus.
It's almost as if he lacks the same depth of passion and commitment to
the story as Winfrey and most of the production crew.  Three writers,
including Richard LaGravenese (The Bridges Of Madison County, etc) and
Adam Brooks (Practical Magic, etc) have shaped this multi-layered
story, but there are still a number of problems with the narrative
structure.  Despite its lengthy running time, there is a suggestion
that many characters and scenes were sacrificed on the cutting room
floor.  Veterans Jason Robards and Tracey Walter (who both appeared in
Demme's Philadelphia) are wasted in small, wordless roles.
Brief, sepia toned flashbacks provides glimpses of some of the
horrors endured by the slaves in America's south before the Civil War.
Tak Fujimoto's cinematography is superb, and Rachel Portman's score,
which draws heavily on Afro-American chants, is also evocative.
Winfrey runs the gamut of emotions here, and her complex
performance provides the film with much of its emotional depth.
Glover is understated in a role that never really goes anywhere.
Newton is superb, and delivers an emotionally and physically demanding
performance as the childlike Beloved.
Despite its rich source material and its fine production
credentials, Beloved is a huge disappointment, and doesn't really
endear itself to audiences.

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise, Irma
P. Hall, Jason Robards
Written by: Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese and Adam Brooks
Based on the novel by: Toni Morrison
Directed by: Jonathan Demme
Running Time: 172 minutes
Date Reviewed: June 30, 1999
Without getting into the whole "Are movies art or entertainment?"
argument, I will say that movies at their basic level are in fact a
VISUAL experience.  The point of going to a movie is to SEE a story
being told.  You as a moviegoer are invited to WATCH the screen in
order to take away whatever it is you wish to take with you from the
film, whether that be artistic merit or pure entertainment.  Well,
about 55 minutes into my viewing of Beloved, I realized that the film
was making me look AWAY from the screen much more often than it was
asking me to look directly at it.  Something tells me that can't be
right.
In those first 55 minutes of Beloved, the story being told is the one
of Sethe (Oprah Winfrey), a former slave who's house in Ohio is
haunted by the spirit of her deceased daughter.  She is also haunted
(understandably mind you) by the horrific memories of her past.  Soon,
an old friend (Danny Glover) re-enters her life, and possibly will
help her to confront her demons... both spiritual and emotional.
Beloved opens with children screaming and a dog being thrown around a
room, seemingly by a spirit in the house.  The dog crashes into a
wall, badly injured with it's eye bulging out of it's head.  Sethe
scoops up the crippled animal and places him on on a table, where she
proceeds to place it's eye back into it's socket.  Over the next 55
minutes we will see similar disgusting images like Oprah urinating,
people vomiting, a young woman seemingly possessed who staggers around
snarling and just being generally repugnant, a very graphic rape, and
so much more.
Now I've been making a point in the review to stress that everything
I'm talking about happens in the film's first 55 minutes.  The reason
for that is because after 55 minutes of extremely unpleasant images, I
realized that life is too short.  I asked myself, "Do I really need to
sit through the remaining two hours of this film?"  I don't get paid
to review films... I'm doing it because I enjoy it.  Beloved was not
bringing me any enjoyment whatsoever.  I'd rather be watching The Big
Lebowski or Glory or The Odd Couple or many other movies that bring me
a great deal of pleasure.  Hell, I could even go OUTSIDE and get some
fresh air, maybe frolic around in a meadow filled with
sunflowers... ANYTHING at all would be better than watching another
second of Beloved.  Yes I understand it was a brutal time period in
our country's history and yes, I understand that not everything in
this world is sunshine and lollipops, but I really just wanted to do
something else.  I'd had enough.  And who knows, maybe the film gets
better in it's next two hours (this write-up is based solely on those
first 55 minutes, mind you).  Like I said though, I have no desire to
ever find out.
Beloved is available on DVD from Touchtone Home Video.  It contains
the film in it's original widescreen aspect ratio of 1.85:1, a
production featurette, and the original theatrical trailer.  The
quality of the DVD is adequate enough, so you can see and hear all of
the revolting images and sounds with crystal clarity.  Enjoy.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Author
Chris Webb
Everything Oprah touches turns to gold, what is surprising is that shehas
sustained her touch for thirteen years.  Emmy-winning and Oscar-nominated
for her first and only other major film role ("The Color Purple"), she is
a best selling author and now sings her television show's theme song.  She
would probably win the Presidency if she wanted.  Still, I entered
"Beloved" with reservations.  When it comes to adaptations, Toni
Morrison's novel is not film-friendly and had tremendous risk of failure.
Sometimes, as is the case with "Beloved," the risk can turn into a
powerful experience.  
        I have read "Beloved" twice and still cannot grasp all of its
intricacies.  I watched with my parents, who have never before read the
book.  This allowed me to judge if reading the book is needed for the
film.  Aside from being able to follow the plot, previous knowledge will
not enhance or detract from the experience.  
        Beloved follows the story of ex-slave Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) eight
years after the end of the Civil War.  An old friend from the plantation
she worked, Paul D (Danny Glover) arrives on her doorstep after wandering
for eighteen years after his own escape.  There he finds Sethe and her
daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise) living in a house haunted by the demons
of Sethe's past.  Her house is possessed by the spirit of the baby
daughter she killed right after her escape to spare her from being claimed
by the master.  This daughter, Beloved (Thandie Newton), returns home in
the body of a teenager further haunting and suffocating the life out of
everyone in the house.
        The story is told partly through flashbacks from Sethe's point of
view.  Director Jonathan Demme weaves image after image of the
psychologically horrific reality that slavery must have been:  the
slaveholder's sons sucking Sethe's nursing milk from her body as Sethe
would have seen it, the spinning delirium of running away from evil not
knowing who is following, the bloody terror of whipping, the gagging and
hanging of slaves.  Demme's use of extreme close-up locks the viewer into
this trauma in almost the same way Stephen Spielberg brought the audience
into the battlefield in "Saving Private Ryan."  It is a grotesque and
nerve-wracking ride, but well worth the struggle. 
        While the direction is inspired, the performances keep the focus
on the characters and story.   The characters of Sethe, Denver, and
Beloved are so deep and layered, "Beloved" should be a woman's acting
dream.   Beah Richards as Baby Suggs, Sethe's soulful mother-in-law that
we see through flashback, is commanding in her small, but pivotal
performance.  Demme is known as an actor's director, and he pulls out
career-defining performances from all the leads.
        I found potentially five acting Oscar nominations that could arise
out of "Beloved."  Yet since 1977, the year I was born, there have been
thirteen Academy Award nominated black actors.  Only one woman, Whoopi
Goldberg ("Ghost" - 1990), has won in that time.   Keep in mind, too, that
only five of the past one hundred acting nominees have been black.
Unfortunately, I do not see this year equaling that total no matter how
good they are.  Then again, maybe Hollywood will put away its bias this
year.
        Oprah Winfrey is almost a shoo-in for the Best Actress
trophy, putting in one of the top performances of the decade.  Kimberly
Elise is riveting as Denver as is Beah Richards.  Danny Glover shines as
Paul D and should score his long overdue first nomination.  But the show
really belongs to Thandie Newton who outdid Morrison in creating a
tangible Beloved.  
        Newton first appears walking out of a lake covered in bugs,
huskily breathing like an alien inside a human body.  She walks as if
uncomfortable in her skin, talks in growly monotone, and eats with
reckless abandon.  Beloved is an unbridled and undeveloped soul trapped in
a human body, and is a creation different from anything in the movies.
Newton exhibits a range of often volatile emotions and unrepressed
sexuality in a sincere, intense, and extremely brave performance.  This
should put her on the acting map for a long time.
        "Beloved" deserves to be seen, but I fear that much of the public
will dismiss it because of its length and complexity.  It is as complex as
the novel, and should leave more questions than answers.  Painful and
frightening, my father mentioned that it unintentionally made for a great
horror movie.  But that is what good films do.  They transcend the
boundaries set by conventional wisdom.
        Toni Morrison endorses "Beloved," always a good sign for a film.
It is a vision that Oprah held for ten years that has finally come to
fruition.  As a result of this labor, we might have a close Oscar race for
the first time in years.  This is one of the best films you will see in
1998, joining "Saving Private Ryan" and "The Spanish Prisoner."  Submerge
yourself in this entrancing film and savor it.  Films this deeply driven
by character do not come around often.  

Author
Scott Renshaw
BELOVED
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Beah Richards.
Screenplay:  Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese and Adam Brooks, based on
the novel by Toni Morrison.
Producers:  Edward Saxon, Jonathan Demme, Gary Goetzman, Oprah Winfrey and
Kate Forte.
Director:  Jonathan Demme.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, nudity, sexual situations, violence)
Running Time:  172 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     BELOVED doesn't feel like a typical Oscar-hyped fall "prestige
release," full of cathartic emotion and earnest dignity.  Its opening
minutes portend something quite different:  two silent exterior shots, one
tracking through a graveyard and the other establishing a rural Ohio home,
shift to a scene of sheer supernatural terror.  Inside the home, a woman
named Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) and her three children cringe in fear as the
family dog spins through the air, an eye torn out and a leg broken by an
anguished spirit.  We learn that the entity is the ghost of another
daughter, who has haunted the house long enough for the latest event to
drive the two boys away from home.  So much for earnest dignity; this is a
prestige release as American gothic horror film.
     That shouldn't be terribly surprising coming from director Jonathan
Demme, who turned 1991's THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS into an Oscar-winning
prestige release.  Yet this is no more a conventional thriller than it is
a conventional epic drama, though it incorporates elements of both.  The
bulk of the film takes place eight years after that prologue sequence,
when the arrival of two strangers shake up the isolated lives of Sethe and
her remaining daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise).  Paul D (Danny Glover), a
former slave with Sethe on the Sweet Home plantation, provides a
companionship Sethe hasn't known for years.  The other arrival is more
mysterious, a child-like woman calling herself Beloved (Thandie Newton).
Their interaction, interwoven with selected flashbacks, turns BELOVED into
a complex ghost story in which the ghosts take on many forms, attacking
both from without and from within.
     It's what BELOVED does with the idea of a ghost story that made Toni
Morrison's novel so powerful, and makes Demme's film so gripping.  The
true horror in the story is Sethe's past, the painful and humiliating past
of all slaves which involved so many horrifying events.  Most film-makers
would have taken those events and shown them off with sincere indignation.
The images created by Demme and cinematographer Tak Fujimoto are jittery
and chilling, designed more to invade the sub-conscious than to inspire
tight-lipped head-shaking.  Beloved appears initially as a sort of
earth-spirit, covered with insects; the bright ribbons of a family
celebration become a lingering symbol of decayed hopes.  With Oprah
Winfrey effectively conveying Sethe's hollow-eyed resignation, BELOVED
shows how a tormented past can corrupt the present to the point that it
feels perpetually haunted, holding meaning only as a constant reminder of
unforgettable evils.
     If BELOVED had intended merely to shock and dismay, it would have
been a very shallow and disspiriting experience.  Instead, it becomes a
call to the living to dare existing in the present, conveyed through two
supporting characters marvelously performed.  Kimberly Elise takes Denver
on a journey from trying to re-capture her own past -- treating Beloved
both as her own child and as the sister she never knew -- to shaking
herself and Sethe into a desire for survival.  Stronger still is the
bright angel of the deceased Baby Suggs (Beah Richards), Denver's paternal
grandmother and the spiritual leader of her community.  Her glorious
sermons, which call all around to celebrate their bodies even as they
acknowledge sorrow, provide stirring punctuation for this tale.  As
counterpoint to Sethe's inability to forgive herself, Baby Suggs enjoins
her listeners to "kiss your hands; love your heart."
     BELOVED is such a side-ranging story that it's bound to feel slightly
disjointed at times.  The flashback to Sethe's escape from Sweet Home
feels particularly drawn out, slowing down a nearly three-hour film.  It's
impressive, however, that three different screenwriters could create so
cohesive an adaptation.  Demme infuses BELOVED with the feverish intensity
of a recurring nightmare, then leaves us with hope of awakening to a new
day.  There is emotion, yes, and dignity; there is also evil, and even
horror.  I can only think of one way to categorize a film like BELOVED:
it may be the most uplifting horror film you'll ever see.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Touchstone Pictures
 Director:  Jonathan Demme
 Writer:  Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese, Adam Brooks,
novel by Toni Morrison
 Cast: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton,
Kimberly Elise, Beah Richards, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Albert Hall
   Each year that I taught American History in high school I
became accustomed to a question from one of the 16-year-
olds, often, surprisingly in an honors program, which
challenged the evils of slavery.  "After all," a serious-minded
teen would pipe up, not ironically, but altogether in earnest,
"Slaves may not have been able to do as they chose, but
they had jobs for life, they were expensive and not likely to be
mistreated, they were taken care of when they got too old to
work."  Of course even given the possibility of some truth in
this, the whole question ignores the fundamental principle of
American democracy: that of freedom, which is just an
abstraction to kids who have had computers to play with, a
comforting home to take shelter in.  Unfortunately, the record
shows that many slaves were owned by sadistic masters who
would beat them ("they're just property, aren't they?") and
allow their young men to take sexual liberties with ("Boys will
be boys, won't they?")  
   I hope these kids will see Jonathan Demme's startling,
idiosyncratic new film, "Beloved."  Two of the African-
Americans focused upon have recently come out of slavery. 
One in particular, Sethe (Oprah Winfrey), is afflicted with
memories that would be enough to send a person with less
emotional vigor to an institution, where she would likely spend
her days climbing the walls or huddled safely in a corner of
the room.  It's 1873, eight years following the emancipation of
slaves nationwide, and Sethe is living with a teenaged
daughter, Denver (Kimberle Elise) in a ramshackle isolated
shack she was somehow able to buy on the outskirts of
Cincinnati.  Theirs is a humble home and, ironically enough,
as the saying goes, there's no place like it.  Nor are you ever
likely to see another movie like "Beloved," Oprah Winfrey's
visualization of the perfect vehicle for her style of acting. 
"Beloved" is more a lyric piece than a melodrama, a film that
has been faithfully adapted by Akosua Busia, Richard
LaGravanese and Adam Brooks from a Pulitzer-prize winning
novel by Toni Morrison.  As a film, it is as likely to be
respected by those for whom Ms. Morrison's writings are too
circuitous, too precious, and altogether too challenging; loved
by those who cherish her rhythmic means of expression.  It is
part horror story, both in the style of "The Exorcist" and in the
more earthy form of the genre like "Amistad."  And it is part
fable of fear, murder and redemption, which dangles its
central character between her horrific remembrances and the
possibility of a promising new life.  Particularly utilizing the
skills of photographer Tak Fujimoto and editor Carol Littleton,
Jonathan Demme directs a film of pathos, terror, and rescue
by the most serviceable procedure: the use of both fleeting
jolts of recollection to furnish us almost subliminally with the
inhumanities of the peculiar institution, and extended
flashbacks which provide us with a more substantial
illustration of slavery's barbarisms.
   The story opens dramatically in 1865 on Sethe's battered
Ohio quarters briefly having us believe that the movie was
influenced by William Friedkin.  Red lights flash and a dog
flies across the room, shaking in what appears to be an
epileptic fit.  124 Bluestone Road is a haunted house, yet one
which in which its inhabitants feel bound to stay, morally as
well as physically.  Eight years after this supernatural
demonstration, Sethe is visited by Paul D (Danny Glover), a
former slave whom Sethe knew and who has been wandering
by foot across the countryside for years.  Looking for a place
to roost, he asks Sethe for quarters: Sethe coyly agrees,
though the ghost which has taken root in the home shows her
displeasure at the visitor.   When a bizarre young woman
washes up fromthe river, scarcely able to speak, she is taken
in by the family, which learn that her name is Beloved
(Thandie Newton).  Beloved does not speak so much as grunt
as though she were raised by wolves and has just come into
the human world.  Despite her attractive appearance--
possessing the skin of a baby and feet that seem never to
have walked before--she is feral, eating like a beast, drooling,
and from time to time pushing Sethe, Paul D and Denver to
the limits of their tolerance.  
   For the remainder of the film's almost three hours, Demme-
-never straying from Toni Morrison's vision--evokes the terror
of slavery not so much as melodrama in the mode of Stephen
Spielberg's more earthbound "Amistad," but by hints,
allusions, at most brief moments of brutality.  Even in a scene
going back to the 1850's, depicting plantation owner School
Teacher's hooligan sons drinking milk straight from Sethe's
breasts, the vista is momentary as though a disembodied
dream bereft of vivid emotion.  At times the story apexes into
moments of high drama, particularly in scenes involving the
title character, who cries out in protest against the Medea-like
deed of her mother eighteen years earlier: "Why you have
me?  Why you leave me?" and it is at points like these that
the account, until then shards of activity that come across like
segregated pieces of a jigsaw puzzle, come together.  Sethe
has escaped from the plantation ironically entitled "Sweet
Home," has given birth on the Kentucky side of a river, and
has transported herself to freedom in Ohio.  But on her 29th
day of freedom, her owners have located her and Sethe,
rather than allow her one-month old daughter to become
subjected to bondage where the white men would soon be
"measuring her behind before tearing it up," she slits the little
girl's throat.
   While Oscar talk is already centered on Oprah Winfrey in
the role of Sethe and Danny Glover as her main man Paul D,
the real find of the film is Thandie Newton who rivets attention
each moment she appears on the screen as the ghost of the
murdered girl.  For those in the audience who, after a couple
of hours have gone by, still do not get the purport of the story,
Demme introduces another poltergeist, Baby Suggs (Beah
Richards), an old woman who is the novelist's raissoneur,
whose monologue to an assembled group of ex-slaves
delivers the essence: "Here in this place, we flesh, flesh that
weeps, laughs; flesh that dances on bare feet in grass.  Love
it...Yonder they do not love your flesh.  They despise it....Love
your hands....Raise them up and kiss them...'cause they don't
love that either.  You got to love it."
   "Beloved" is a powerful tale yet one which requires patience
and attention, a willingness to allow an accumulation of detail
to yield a fleshed-out fable.  A story of a woman with a
frightful deed on her conscience, one which allows her no
peace, "Beloved" deals with a former slave who must
simultaneously raise a willful teen and a mutinous ghost, the
latter both victim and accuser.  To the production's credit,
nothing is dumbed down in this movie which is allegiant to the
author's vision, one which both stays true to the role of film as
a visual instrument and to its ability to cast itself as a literary
medium.  It is serious, entertaining, filled with laudable
performances, a must-see for people who respect the cinema
as a potent means of communication.

Author
James Sanford
        A film adaptation of a novel that's won both the Nobel and Pulitzer
Prizes -- as well as a devoted following worldwide -- would seem to be a
project fraught with potential pitfalls, especially when that novel is Toni
Morrison's "Beloved," a non-linear chronicle of the lives of former slaves
in post-Civil War Ohio. But producer-actress Oprah Winfrey refused to let
naysayers dissuade her from pursuing her dream of putting the book on the
screen, and, when these skeptics take a look at the movie Winfrey and
director Jonathan Demme ("Silence of the Lambs") have created, chances are
they will eat their words.
 An intense, often impressionistic picture about the price of
freedom "Beloved" represents a personal triumph for its star, whose
performance in the role of Sethe, the runaway servant who is literally
haunted by her past, ensures Winfrey will never again be thought of as just
a talk show hostess.
 Sethe is a woman who would rather share her home with a ghost than
move on; after fleeing north with her children, Sethe insists, "I will never
run from another thing on this earth." As Winfrey journeys through the dark
caverns of Sethe's soul, you can almost see the grief seeping out of her
every pore. It's not a showy, let's-win-an-Oscar star turn, but a quiet,
devestating piece of character work.
 Demme, following Winfrey's lead, does not attempt to simplify or
launder Morrison's tale, a la Steven Spielberg's widely criticized take on
Alice Walker's "The Color Purple." From "Beloved"'s first scene, in which an
angry spirit shakes Sethe's house and hurls her dog against a wall, this is
a demanding, unsettling picture full of savage violence and deep-seated
misery. Even when Sethe finds some degree of comfort in the arms of old
friend Paul D (Danny Glover), a fellow escapee from "Sweethome," the sight
of their broken, scarred bodies coming together is heartbreaking rather than
erotic.
 Glover's work as Paul D reminds us once again what a powerful actor
he can be when he's not wasting his talents on tripe like "Lethal Weapon 4,"
and as Sethe's "charmed child" Denver, Kimberly Elise is outstanding.
 Like most of Demme's movies, this one benefits enormously from the
photography of Tak Fujimoto, whose smooth style calls attention to the drama
rather than the cameraman's artistry. "Beloved"'s often fragmented, jarring
flashback sequences have been shot on washed-out stock that gives them an
appropriately unreal look.
 Not all of Demme's risk-taking pays off, though. Particularly
detrimental to the film is Thandie Newton in the title role, as a mystery
woman who emerges from the river and takes up residence under Sethe's roof.
If Winfrey's acting is refreshingly free of technique, Newton's is crawling
with it, and her studied, almost goofy mannerisms (big eyes, a twisted jaw,
etc.) go a long way toward diluting the vivid atmosphere Demme and Winfrey
have taken such pains to create. In defense of Newton however, the ethereal
Beloved may be an unplayable part; any actress would have been perplexed by
this character who is alternately sprite and succubus, child-woman and
madwoman.
 If "Beloved" sometimes fails to deliver the emotional wallop the
audience expects, it's because Demme and his cast aren't interested in easy
tear-jerking. They're out to create a genuinely cathartic experience, and
more often than not, they succeed; when "Beloved" does connect, it does so
with the force of a sledgehammer to the heart.
James Sanford

Author
Kevin Patterson
Most films about slavery address the subject by immersing themselves in the
America of the early to late 1800s, showing us first-hand the cruelty of
the system and the cold-hearted selfishness of those who perpetuated its
existence. While there's nothing wrong with this, it's always nice to see a
fresh approach to the topic, and Jonathan Demme delivers that with his new
film BELOVED, based (very faithfully, I'm told) on the Toni Morrison novel
of the same name.
BELOVED stays away from Southern slave plantations for the most part,
instead focusing on an African-American family living in rural Ohio in the
1870s. The mother Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) is an ex-slave who lives with her
daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise), her two sons having left the house in
fear eight years earlier. The house is haunted by the spirit of Sethe's
youngest daughter, who apparently died as an infant. Into this setting
wanders Paul D (Danny Glover), an old friend from the slave plantation who
soon becomes Sethe's lover and who can help her fill in at least one
important blank from her past. Adding to an already bizarre situation is
the sudden appearance of Beloved (Thandie Newton), an apparently sick and
traumatized young girl who mysteriously shows up in Sethe's backyard one
afternoon and who seems to have lost her memory.
There isn't much of a plot per se in BELOVED. The film instead concentrates
on the interactions between Sethe, Paul D, Beloved, and Denver. The
screenwriters make a wise choice in withholding the whole picture from the
audience, thus ensuring the viewers' interest as the characters are
sketched out on-screen. Gradually, our questions are answered as to why
Sethe's neighbors scorn her when the family goes to the local carnival, how
the ghostly first daughter died, and how Sethe originally escaped from
slavery, and why her husband isn't with her. The biggest engima is Beloved
herself, who sometimes seems to be a pleasant-spirited, innocent young
girl, but also sometimes manipulates the situation so as to undermine the
relationships between Sethe, Paul D, and Denver. She clearly has a
connection to the family, but neither the other characters nor the audience
know what it is at first.
The pains and tribulations of the characters' pasts are revealed both
through flashbacks and through their present-day emotions and choices, as
Demme handles the slavery aspect delicately without indulging in obvious
manipulation or sentimentality. BELOVED doesn't seek to portray slavery
itself, but its after-effects on those who survived it. The use of the
supernatural might seem out of place at first, but it actually functions
very well as a metaphorical device. A horrifying secret about Sethe's past
is soon to be revealed, and the supernatural aspect helps to show us a
woman who is quite literally haunted by the past. If BELOVED is "about"
anything other than its characters and their interactions, it's about the
urge to look to the future, even when the past is so unforgettably
horrible. And yet Sethe is not made to look foolish or obsessed: we
understand why she behaves the way she does. Denver is more of a "good
example" in that she wants to get away from their isolated country house
and find work in the city, but then again, she never had to live through
slavery, since she was born while Sethe was on the run. BELOVED manages to
have a "message" and still be compassionate and sympathetic to those who
don't catch onto it at first.
BELOVED may move a little slowly in a few places, but whatever its minor
weaknesses, they are more than compensated for by Demme's skillful
direction, the imaginative style of storytelling, and the outstanding
performances, particularly from Winfrey and from Newton, whose awkward
speech and motion is eerily effective. A well-constructed and deeply honest
film, BELOVED is easily one of the best of the year.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Film Reviews Page: http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
I haven't read _Beloved_, but I can see why it was a prize-winning
novel.  The story is of Sethe, her daughter Denver, and Paul D., who are
former slaves being terrorized by a poltergeist.  Digging deeper, the
"ghost" aspect serves as a complex allegory of the past, and it evokes
sentiments of mystery, awe, beauty, and repressed horror.
The film "Beloved" evokes no such sentiment.  If ever there were to be a
textbook case of a film with noble intentions, a stellar cast, a
reputable director, and a stellar Oscar-baiting campaign, doomed,
doomed, doomed, due to the miscasting of that single pivotal figure,
this is it.
That character is played by Thandie Newton, and her performance is
god-awful.  She isn't mysterious.  She isn't horrifying.  She doesn't
evoke the central metaphor of repressed emotions of slavery.  She evokes
the cheese of Roger Corman and Ed Wood, sans charisma.
For example, to evoke terror, she speaks in breathy monotone, shifting
her jaw to the right.  Scary?  Why, it's flat-out hilarious!  Gusts of
laughter were heard in the screening I attended.
The rest of the cast is in an entirely different league.  Oprah Winfrey
is good as Sethe, but this is familiar terrain for those who have seen
her in _Native Son_.  Danny Glover suffices, though he's just playing
himself.  The real surprise is Kimberly Elise.  She's fantastic, in the
same way that Natalie Portman and Claire Danes are beyond their years.
When she's onscreen, you see her performance abosolutely riveted, filled
with resentment and fear, and never enjoying her childhood.  Elise's
performance was the single reason why I weathered the entirity of the
film.
At three hours, the film is too long, and perhaps could do without some
scenes of Grandma preaching in the woods.  Further, it could have done
without the multiple gross-out scenes that have nothing to do with the
central theme of slavery.  Ants crawling on a young woman?  A dog's eye
poked out?  Oprah urinating?  A pregnant naked woman shrieking in
public?  Still reading this?
Back to the title character.  Perhaps the character was so hard to
portray that no casting could have sufficed (a possible exception would
be the Caucasian Emily Watson, who treaded familiar ground successfully
in _Breaking the Waves_).  Perhaps it would have been better to
underwrite Beloved's character so completely, that all we see is an
invisible person, and the family's reaction to her.
My point being, as long as the mysterious Beloved is described with
words, she would remain an indelible creation of our own imaginations.
But because Jonathan Demme and Oprah had chosen to be explicit in the
film's portrayal of the title character, the mystery is gone, and what
results is the impossible fusion of the important period piece and a
campy horror film.  And like oil and water, they just don't mix.
Who was this film made for?  Patrons who enjoy campy horror fluff would
not want to sit thru a three-hour self-important message film, and the
prestigious artsy types would not want any campy gore with their
delectable Oscar-bait delight.
_That_ is the reason why this film bombed.  It's not that viewers prefer
the dumb antics of _The Waterboy_.  It's that if we want to laugh at a
movie, we want to make sure that the film was _supposed_ to be funny.

Author
Brian Takeshita
The day after I saw this film, someone asked me if it was good or bad.
Honestly, it took me a few moments to come up with an answer.  You see,
BELOVED, based on the novel by Toni Morrison, is good in so many ways, yet
terrible on such a fundamental level as to be inexcusable.  While most
movies have pros and cons, this one suffered from faults that were so
glaring, they seemed to cancel many of the meritorious aspects.
Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) is an escaped slave living in Ohio with her teenage
daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise).  When Denver and her siblings were still
very young, Sethe's master came up from Kentucky to claim his "property,"
and in a confused frenzy, Sethe attempted to kill all four of her children
so they would not be taken back.  In her desperate attempt, Sethe was only
able to knock the eldest three children unconscious, but managed to kill her
youngest daughter, who's spirit haunted their house ever since.  This
haunting isn't the type that opens a cabinet door now and then, or moves a
spoon from the kitchen counter to the living room when nobody's looking.
When Paul D (Danny Glover), a fellow slave from Kentucky, comes into the
house and takes an obvious romantic interest in Sethe, the spirit shakes the
structure to the foundation and hurls a table across the room, threatening
to cut Paul D in half.  No wonder Sethe's two boys ran away years ago.
The romance that blossoms between Sethe and Paul D is both a reawakening and
reconciliation of Sethe's past.  By getting reacquainted with someone who
shared her experiences on the plantation, it is clear that Sethe can now
vocalize some of the most horrible moments of her life, and in doing so,
gain strength from the fact that she survived.  Paul D's arrival also fills
the hole left by the husband whom Sethe never saw after escaping from
Kentucky.  However, as much as Sethe manages to put her life together and
become happy once again, the child that she killed continues to haunt her.
In essence, this film is about a woman trying to come to terms with her
past, and in that respect, BELOVED is very engaging.  While Sethe is seen as
a strong woman early on, her transformation into a whole person is tangible,
and Winfrey, who delivers a startlingly convincing performance, gets much of
the credit for this.  In developing the relationships between man and woman,
and mother and daughter, BELOVED is also able to provide several dimensions
to the storyline.  Danny Glover is a joy to watch on screen as he gives an
earth-natural performance of a very likable character, and capitalizes upon
the significant chemistry between Winfrey and himself.  Kimberly Elise is
also very impressive as the daughter who must vie for the attention of her
mother, while consistently supporting her in every way she can.
Director Jonathan Demme emerses us so deeply in the period that we really
get a good feeling for what it was like in the mid-1800's.  We watch from
beginning to end as Sethe makes biscuits from scratch and bakes them in a
cast-iron stove.  We are witness to the continual process of scrubbing
wooden board floors, and the ungainly drudgery of using a pole to assist in
doing the laundry in a tub of boiling water.  So many details provide an
interesting authenticity to this film, and it pays off by allowing us to
share in the day-to-day experiences of the characters, and therefore
appreciate them a little more.
This human aspect of the film is so interesting and full of possibilities
that it could have been it's own movie.  In fact, it should have been,
because the second aspect, the supernatural subplot, only weighs down the
rest of the film.  The haunting scenes seem out of place and totally
unnecessary, as if someone had gotten the great idea that by combining two
absolutely different films, he could somehow take advantage of some kind of
cinematic economy of scale.  Worse yet, Sethe's youngest becomes tired of
mere haunting and materializes as a teenage girl in front of the family
house.  Just like she showed up at the door, so did this subplot.
Thandie Newton plays Beloved, the re-embodied spirit, in a way that leads
you to believe that although the character's body is the age it would have
been had she lived, her mind is still that of an infant or young adolescent.
Newton's performance is quite proficient, although it does become rather
grating after a while.  If an infant learned to talk, would we really want
to listen to its blathering all the time?  What I couldn't figure out was
why the whole thing seemed so normal to the main characters.  After getting
over an initial shock, all involved just take living in a haunted house with
a grain of salt, and accept the fact that a dead relative returned from the
grave.
Beloved's presence exists for the sole purpose of symbolizing Sethe's past
coming back to haunt her, ironically returning Sethe to a figurative state
of slavery.  Sethe's world is turned upside-down, and her own very existence
is subjugated to the care of her newly returned daughter.  However,
BELOVED's supernatural element is so extraneous that the film could easily
have been turned into a very compelling conventional human drama.  Whenever
we see Newton's character, it's like a second story trying to insinuate
itself into the one we're watching.  It's strange, cumbersome, and
distracting, so why not just take it out altogether?  We could still have
Sethe struggle with her own conscience without all of the weirdness.  Now
that would be a film I'd like to see.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
BELOVED
Cast: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise, Beah
Richards, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Albert Hall, Irma P. Hall
Director: Jonathan Demme
Screenplay: Adam Brooks, Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese based on the
novel by Toni Morrison
Australian theatrical release: May 6, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
To its credit, Beloved is not a conventional period piece.  In fact,
there is really nothing ordinary in the themes that are explored in this
film.  Oprah Winfrey's labor of love that she nurtured for over a decade
is a peculiar and often unsettling mixture of horror and drama. The film
succeeds in crafting extraordinary characters and moments, but with an
almost three-hour running time one might question the existence of an
editor.  It's difficult to put a finger on what director Jonathan Demme
(Silence of the Lambs, Philadelphia) and the screenwriters are trying to
tell us, not because it is something incredibly profound, but rather
because there are too many subplots that detract from the story's
meaning.
Sethe (Winfrey) is a runaway slave who has a simple existence with her
daughter Denver (Kimberley Elise), in rural Ohio.  The year is 1873, and
an angry spirit haunts the house they live in.  Sethe's past, we learn,
contains disturbing memories of unforgettable sins, which seem to get
progressively worse as the film plods along.  The two are joined by Paul
D (Danny Glover), a former slave who stays with Sethe and Denver in the
hope of becoming a family.  But a mysterious guest who goes by the name
of Beloved (Thandie Newton) arrives on the scene.  Where she came from,
who she came with and why she is there is at first a mystery, but later
things are revealed as the past once again comes up to bite Sethe.
Although adapted from Toni Morrison's Pulitzer Prize winning novel,
Beloved doesn't seem very literate. There are moments in novels that
cannot retain much of their power once a conversion to film has been
made; that's just the way it is, I guess.  As easily as a picture can
tell a thousand words, words usually have greater meaning.  The pictures
that cinematographer Tak Fujimoto uses are very fine indeed, ranging
from the ghostly looking old house (which was built especially for the
film) to the grainy texture of the story's flashbacks.  Where Beloved
fails is sustaining power in its imagery; for all the disturbing images
evoked, the script doesn't have the power to back them up.  Illiterate
is not the right word - inferior, perhaps, is.
That's not to say that Beloved was a mistake to make, since Jonathan
Demme has a solid shot at getting it right.  He squeezes strong
performances from all of his cast, notably Oprah Winfrey and Danny
Glover.  Beloved's strange actions and manner of speaking no doubt
demanded a lot of talent from Thandie Newton, but her character
frustrated me for those reasons.  I was patiently waiting for Beloved's
emotional climax in which her actions would form a basis of
understanding for her character, but that never came.
Demme also directs with a flair for the bizarre, which isn't surprising
considering this is the man who turned the grim Silence of the Lambs
into an Oscar winning success.  Needless of how good the final product
turned out to be, Beloved deserves respect as an artistic creation that
ventures into the realms of the extraordinary, without losing sight of
what _makes_ something extraordinary.  But Beloved as a whole does not
fit into that category.  It is a film that attempts to be better than
most but ends up falling behind, primarily due to inefficient scripting
and editing.  To see an extraordinary film that is extraordinarily
made - now that would be something.


Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Beloved (1998)
Oprah Winfrey (Sethe), Danny Glover (Paul D), Thandie Newton (Beloved), 
Kimberly Elise (Denver), Beah Richards (Baby Suggs), Lisa Gay Hamilton 
(Younger Sethe), Albert Hall (Stamp Paid), Irma P. Hall (Ella), Carol 
Jean Lewis (Janey Wagon), Kessia Kordelle (Amy Denver), Jude Ciccolella 
(Schoolteacher), Anthony Chisholm (Langhorne), Dorothy Love Coates (M. 
Lucille Williams), Jane Whire (Lady Jones), Jason Robards (Mr. Bodwin). 
Music by Rachel Portman. Cinematography by Tak Fujimoto. Produced by 
Edward Saxon, Jonathan Demme, Gary Goetzman, Oprah Winfrey, Kate Forte. 
Screenplay by Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese, Adam Brooks. Based on 
the novel by Toni Morrison. Directed by Jonathan Demme. 172 minutes. 
Rated R, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
The intent of the much anticipated "Beloved" is for viewers to leave the 
theater mesmerized, reflecting on the horror of slavery and its 
nightmarish aftereffects on the human soul. Jonathan Demme's film version 
of the Pulitzer Prize winning Toni Morrison novel achieves those goals to 
a degree, but the effect is somewhat muted by static central characters, 
several notable stylistic and structural problems and the production's 
often glacial pacing. It's been said that truly great films never feel 
too long. At two hours and fifty two minutes, "Beloved" does.
Like many classic chamber dramas, the film is presented "onion-style." 
Following the introduction of the central characters, layer after layer 
of the onion is peeled away, gradually revealing the emotional core of 
the characters. This is a ghost story, both figuratively and literally, 
and Demme opens the film with a lengthy, effective set-up. In 1873, 
former slave Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) and her daughter Denver (Kimberly 
Elise) live a reclusive existence inside a rural home near Cincinnati. 
The house is haunted and the rest of the family has abandoned Sethe long 
ago, yet she refuses to leave. Demme presents the haunting graphically 
with images that echo "Poltergeist"; floorboards and tables rattle, 
objects fly through the air, a dog's eye pops out of its socket. 
Enter Paul D (Danny Glover), who knew Sethe when they were both slaves in 
Kentucky. He encounters the spirit, believed by the women to be the ghost 
of one of Sethe's children, and his strength of will appears to subdue 
the presence. Paul D moves into the house after becoming Sethe's lover 
and, for a brief period, it appears that the three might be able to forge 
a traditional family life. That all changes when Sethe and Denver return 
from a carnival and encounter Beloved (Thandie Newton).
We first see the wild child as she raises from a swampy muck, covered 
with insects, and drags herself to Sethe's front yard. The women take in 
the exhausted near-mute, restoring her to health and attempting to teach 
the drooling, growling creature how to be a proper young adult. While 
Sethe and Denver embrace Beloved, Paul D remains leery, suspecting 
there's more to this feral adolescent than meets the eye. He's right. 
Between Sethe's encounters with Beloved and a series of flashbacks, the 
onion layers begin to peel away. We learn about Sethe's past; the 
horrific treatment she endured as a slave, how she received the criss-
crossed ''tree'' of scars on her back, her delivery of a child while 
traversing the river to Ohio following her escape from Kentucky. We also 
witness the night where, in a desperate attempt to spare her children 
from a life of slavery, Sethe made a decision that hurled her into a 
perpetual nightmare.
''Silence of the Lambs'' director Jonathan Demme employs color 
manipulation, a variety of unusual camera movements and extreme close-ups 
for the powerful imagery required by ''Beloved.'' Sometimes it works, but 
often it does not. It's hard to appreciate a simple front porch 
conversation when Demme's camera is either swooping around the yard or 
flipping between full-screen face shots of whichever character is 
speaking. And while some of the shocking scenes, like Beloved's initial 
appearance, are appropriate, did we really need a close-up of Sethe 
squatting and unleashing a massive stream of urine? 
1873 Cincinnati is beautifully realized, and a carnival scene is both 
charming and wonderfully detailed, but most of the film takes place in 
Sethe's dilapidated home. The flashback sequences are effective, but we 
don't get enough of them, resulting in a portrayal of Sethe's past that 
is unnecessarily sketchy. Demme's insistence on keeping his camera 
focused on Oprah Winfrey, who optioned the book and brought it to the 
screen, eventually gives the film the vague whiff of a vanity project.
''Beloved'' features many exceptional supporting performances, 
particularly from Beah Richards as Denver's grandmother, home-spun 
preacher Baby Suggs. Winfrey and Glover do fine, nuanced work, although 
the static nature of their characters limits their range. Kimberly Elise, 
on the other hand, is allowed to grow and change as young Denver 
graduates from childhood naďveté to become a self-realized woman. Elise 
shines in the role.
The film's most striking performance comes from Thandie Newton as Beloved.
 The lovely actor disappears completely into the part, and is 
appropriately frightening and tragic at first, but as the film drags on, 
her limp-headed, jerky characterization becomes cartoonish, reminding me 
of Gilda Radner's dim-witted rag doll character from the old ''Saturday 
Night Live.'' 
By the time ''Beloved'' finally reaches its conclusion, Demme's 
directorial excesses leave the viewer more exhausted than enlightened. 
Faithful to a fault to the source novel, ''Beloved'' suffers from too 
much exposition without enough details, too many camera games, too few 
flashbacks, too little pay-off at the end and too much Oprah. Within 
''Beloved'' lies a great movie with a powerful message, but its impact is 
muffled due to the filmmakers' indulgence and lack of restraint.

Author
Matt Prigge
Director: Jonathan Demme
Writers: Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese, and Adam Brooks (based on
the novel by Toni Morrison)
Starring: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Beah Richards, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Albert Hall, Irma P. Hall
Since most movies about slavery shield us from the true horrors of what
they're portraying, it's fitting to say that "Beloved" come as a real
shock as a film.  It's confusing, bizarre, and as tough a film to watch
as any film I've seen all year, and that's not necessarily because of
the three-hour running time.  "Beloved" is challenging to watch, filled
with tough and powerful poetry that takes us completely off guard, and
instead of a straight-forward, Hollywood-ized story about what happened
to the slaves after they were freed, "Beloved" comes off as a cry of
anguish from all those who actually lived through what happened (or,
rather, Toni Morrison, who wrote the novel upon which this is based).
"Beloved" tells the story of an ex-slave named Sethe, played by Oprah
Winfrey, who lives on a large farm in the north with her children.  When
the film opens, her house is being terrorized by a poltergeist, which
shakes things up, wounds the dog, and makes things generally
uncomfortable for the family.  Sethe is proud, though, and will not
move.  Her sons run away, leaving only her and her daughter, Denver
(Kimberly Elise) alone with the ghost which is there without any factual
explanation.
A couple years pass, and the ghost remains, and one day, a man named
Paul D (Danny Glover), another ex-slave who knew Sethe years ago when
they worked on a plantation together, arrives, asking for lodging.  He
has been wandering around since he left the plantation, and when he
enters the house, it turns red and becomes incredibly hot.  When he
remarks about what he thinks is evil, Sethe replies "It ain't evil.
It's just sad."
Some more time passes, and Paul D has become a fervent member of the
household, and the ghost disappears.  But when they return one day from
going out, they discover a young woman sitting in the house.  Her name
is Beloved, and as played by Thandie Newton, she has almost zero motor
skills.  She stumbles around, half-grabbing onto things and knocking
them over, and when she speaks, she lets out a low guttural sound that
eventually turns into baby talk.  They let her into her house, and she
begins to turn things upside down.
"Beloved" acts like an incredibly difficult chamber drama paired with a
ghost story.  Most of the scenes consist of people arguing in one
claustrophobic, low-lit room, with the occasional flash to the past,
where we see images of such horror that we thank god for modern-day
psychoanalysts.  Sethe and Paul D have lived through such hellish times
that they are forever implanted with the memories of their slavehood on
the old plantation, which includes such images as Sethe being raped by
the white plantation hands, with her nipples being licked, prompting her
to cry out to Paul D when reminiscing about it, "They took my milk!"
Worst of all was the month after her freedom, when she was allowed to
live like a free person, working with other blacks on a farm, and then
seeing that her old plantation owners have arrived to presumedly take
her and her children back.  She runs to the barn near by, carrying her
four children, and when her old owners burst in, they discover she has
murdered one of them and is ready to murder the rest of them if they
don't leave them alone.  When she is inquired about this moment by Paul
D in a moment halfway through the film, she says she doesn't regret it.
She killed her daughter so that she would not have to live through the
horror she did, and she has convinced herself she did the right thing.
Of course, Beloved is really her daugher materialized, though we aren't
flat out told that until later on in the film.  Beloved represents the
pain and suffering the slaves went through and shows how difficult it
was for them to deal with their freedom after being tortured for so
long.  Thus, "Beloved" becomes a sorta-redux of the Andrei Tarkofsky
sci-fi classic, "Solaris," where a cosmonaut discovers that his wife,
who commited suicide years before, has materialized when he is orbiting
over a planet with a complex brain system.  That film spoke volumes
about humanity and our memories, how we are constantly regretting what
happened in the past, and when if it ever literally came back to haunt
us, it would control us completely.
"Beloved" moves along freely, without a lot of explanation, and for the
most part, this is extremely respectable.  The most interesting films
are the ones that don't explain everything for us, leaving gaps in the
characters that we are supposed to fill in with how they act in the
present tense.  Sethe is never fully explained as a character, but we
understand all her actions since she's being played by Oprah Winfrey.
It's been well over a decade since her last major performance in "The
Color Purple," but judging from these two films, I'll bet she's one of
the best actresses working today...if she was strictly an actress.  Her
talk show, which I suppose is a great entity, has prevented her from
becoming a noteworthy actress, and that's a shame because she brings so
much to this movie.  Emotion.  Sadness.  Strength.  Watching the strong
Sethe, who's so afraid of the past that she's built a rather strong
protective coating around herself, break down when she discovers who
Beloved really is is what makes this movie really great.  She makes it
real.
That's not to say this is a perfect film.  In fact, I'd wager to say
that the fact that it's confusing and painful to watch is what prevents
this from being the truly great film it is.  While Oprah's performance
is powerful and easily sympathetic (and I'm dying to see her win at
least an Oscar nomination this February), the structure of the film,
which doesn't show what happened to her children till halfway through
the film, prevents us from really making a cohesive connection to the
film.  It doesn't necessarily move as though they're memories of one
particular character, and by the end, it has lost control over Sethe,
and as she takes to bed, we are unable to truly identify with her
anymore.
But despite its tediousness, perhaps that's the point.  The distancing
by the end of the film may be just part of the way it has been built
from the start, since they figure she has crossed over from being
identifiable, and it needs to get back with reality.  And for the most
part, this film seems like the cry of pain from the slaves that it
really wants to be.  Jonathan Demme's direction is bizarre, in nature
with the story, and he creates the right mood, making it a tough film to
sit through, making sure that the audience feels as uncomfortable as the
characters.
There's more to admire here, like the way that the flashbacks pop up
freely and without real organization, just like they would be in real
life; and the way that the ending leaves it somewhat open to more pain
and suffering, but laced with a touch of optimism.  The acting, not only
from Winfrey, is amazing, and I anticipate not only she will get an
Oscar nomination.  Everyone has been raving about Thandie Newton's
performance, and how it should be rewarded.  However, it must be noted
that out of everyone, she had the easiest part.  Act like a baby.  Throw
things.  Stumble around.  Chew food with your mouth open.  I do think
there's another performance worthy of Oscar conisderation, but it's
Kimberly Elise, as the daugher who has to stay sensible and sane, and
has to carry the burden of her mother's loss of reality towards the
end.  It's not that Newton isn't great: she's as annoying and wacky as
the role demands.  It's just that Elise has the tougher job and pulls it
off even better.
Despite the fact that this film has Winfrey written all over it, and not
that of writer Morrison or director Demme, "Beloved" has still not done
well.  Costing, I think, around ninety million dollars, it has since
grossed about twenty-two.  Unfortunately, this film is a little too
intense for viewers, even for me, and I can stand almost anything (I
recently viewed the 2 1/2 hour long epic "Caligula," the worst film I
have ever seen in my life, and did it in a mere 2 sittings).  Although I
respect "Beloved," I can't say that I really enjoyed it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Jonathan Demme.
Cast: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Kimberly Elise, Thandie Newton, Beah 
Richards, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Albert Hall, Irma P. Hall.
1998 - 174 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, violence, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed October 20, 1998.
It is known that it took Oprah Winfrey ten years to bring Nobel Prize 
winner Toni Morrison's novel, "Beloved," to the screen, and she was 
determined to get it made. It was only until she met director Jonathan 
Demme (1991's "Silence of the Lambs") that she knew she had found the 
perfect person to make the adaptation.
"Beloved" is a mysterious, unusual, sprawling epic, running just under 3 
hours, and set in Cincinnati, circa 1873. Sethe (Oprah Winfrey), a 
former slave, lives in a quaint rural home with her quiet 18-year-old 
daughter, Denver (Kimberly Elise), and an angry ghost that haunts the 
house. Sethe also had two sons that ran away eight years earlier, and a 
baby daughter whom is no longer with her. Aside from the ghost, things 
begin to look up for Sethe when an old friend from her slave days at 
Sweet Home, Paul D (Danny Glover), turns up on her doorstep one day and 
becomes her lover. The peculiar title character, Beloved (Thandie 
Newton), enters the film thirty minutes into it, found with her back up 
against a tree stump in front of their house, beetles crawling all over 
her body. Sethe allows Beloved to stay at their home, and she becomes a 
sort of playmate with Denver, but it is obvious from the start that 
there is something awfully fishy about this young woman.
That is all of the story that I would even dare mention, because 
"Beloved" is the type of movie that, if you are unfamiliar with the plot 
going in, the less said, the better. Those going into "Beloved" 
expecting a slavery drama will, no doubt, be rather shocked by the film, 
as it is filled with many supernatural elements, and deals with such 
elements as ghosts, evil spirits, and resurrection.
"Beloved" is a deliberately-paced, but well-crafted, exceptionally 
performed motion picture. There are so many brilliantly effective 
moments throughout that it is quite disappointing when, after 3 hours of 
investing your time in it, it doesn't seem to add up to much. The story 
is intriguing and truly original, and the film felt as if it was leading 
up to an emotional powerhouse of an ending, but after the central story 
concludes, the film goes on for another twenty minutes, which is 
especially problematic since the intensity and mystery of the story has 
vanished. Although the ending starts to drag, there also seem to be 
chunks of the story that have been edited out, which was a mistake. 
Things occur quickly in the last hour, and plot elements are forgotten 
about or go unexplained. My guess is that the picture was originally a 
4-hour film, so they had to trim it, but in doing so, they edited the 
wrong section out. It was the very ending that needed a severe edit, not 
the sections that they did cut out.
Maybe it is beginning to sound like I didn't care for, "Beloved," which 
is untrue. Although nowhere nearly as brilliant as it would like to be, 
the film is nonetheless an admirable piece of work.
The performances from the central cast are, by far, the highlight of the 
piece. Winfrey, in her first feature film since 1985's superior, "The 
Color Purple," is strong and self-assured, not to mention able to get 
the viewer to forget that she is a talk show host from the first frame. 
Thandie Newton, as the difficult Beloved, has what is probably the most 
difficult role, as she is given what is perhaps an unplayable role. 
Newton somehow succeeds, however, in both capturing our sympathy in one 
scene, and frustrating us in the next. The standout in the cast is 
Kimberly Elise, who gives the film's most touching, sympathetic 
performance. She very much deserves an Academy Award nomination come 
next February. She is that dazzling.
While watching "Beloved," I could easily see one of the best films of 
the year within, but it ultimately let me down in its penultimate 
moments. Winfrey, Demme, and screenwriters Akosua Busia, Richard 
LaGravenese, and Adam Brooks, should be applauded for successfully 
adapting such a complex, unwieldly novel, but it certainly could have 
been so much more. 
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman 
Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Matt Williams
The movie Beloved is rather like it's title character:  unusual,
disorienting and not quite what you'd expect.  However, that's not to
say that the film isn't good (which it is), but rather that it's a
difficult beast to classify.  It's eerily supernatural, yet with an
earthy realism.  It's intimate in scale, and yet epic in scope.
Oprah Winfrey stars as Sethe, a woman who ran away from slavery eighteen
years earlier, and now lives on the outskirts on Cincinnati.  She lives
with her antisocial daughter, Denver (Kimberly Elise), as well as a
mysterious poltergeist, in their house at 124 Bluestone Road.
Yes, you read that right, "poltergeist".  Their house is haunted.  And
while the Amityville-goings-on might scare away anyone with common
sense, Sethe is simply tired of running.  Besides, the spirit which
shakes their house and squeezes their dog isn't evil..."just sad".
But things are stirred up by the arrival of two visitors.  The first is
Paul D (Danny Glover), a weary man who knew Sethe when they were both
slaves at the Sweet Home Plantation.  The second is more mysterious, an
asthmatic girl (Thandie Newton) who moves like an epileptic puppet and
calls herself "Beloved" in a croaking voice.
Jonathan Demme directs this adaptation of Toni Morrison's novel with a
hallucinatory flair.  Some scenes are oversaturated, others faded.
Colors glow, the angles shift... it's almost as if the camera is
possessed, as well as the house.  Yet, through it all, we are able to
connect and bond with the characters, and experience the horrors and
triumphs of their story.
Oprah Winfrey could have her pick of roles, and certainly could have
picked a more glamorous one than Sethe, but it would have been hard to
find a stronger character. Wounded with scars deeper than the welts on
her back, Sethe is a complex, multilayered character.  Many an actress
might have stumbled in the role, but Oprah is up to the challenge, and
delivers Sethe's many facets.
Danny Glover isn't as lucky.  His Paul D is as downtrodden as Sethe, but
not as nuanced. We learn little about him as the film progresses, and,
eventually, he is just cast aside.  We see his external feelings towards
Sethe, Beloved and Denver, but rarely his motivations.
Thandie Newton is appropriately creepy and charming in the role of
Beloved.  Though, even at the end of the film, many things about her
remain a mystery, it is a fascinating character, and a challenging
role.  Kimberly Elise's Denver is less showy, but no less well acted.
She is able to hold her own against all the otherworldly happenings in
her house...just not ready to face the real world.
The storyline of Beloved is complex, but not convoluted.  It does
require that you pay attention, however.  An ill-timed bathroom run
during this 3-hour movie may mean you'll be missing the keystone to the
whole puzzle.  Be warned.
Perhaps the best adjective to describe Beloved is "haunting".  Just as
Sethe and Paul D are haunted by the past, and just as 124 Bluestone Road
is haunted...so too, you'll be haunted by Beloved.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 600 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: October 16, 1998
Starring: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Beah Richards
Directed by: Jonathan Demme
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violent images, sexuality, nudity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/beloved.htm
It's possible to classify cinema based on literature as an entirely
seperate genre aside from action, comedy, drama, and the usual
categories. Those movies which are based on books are almost always a
testament to their source - the author wrote such a visually or mentally
outstanding novel that it begged to be brought to life on the screen -
but as cinema alone they are often disappointing ventures. The most
disappointing transplant within the last few years was James Patterson's
KISS THE GIRLS: although the novel was tense and a very exciting read,
the movie was lackluster and far from noteworthy. The latest product of
this movement, Toni Morrison's BELOVED, does not stoop to such levels,
but it is a rather disappointing movie. 
With all of the talent involved - both in front of the camera, behind
it, and in the script - BELOVED was almost a surefire lock for the
Oscars in March of next year. (It still may harbor such chances, as both
the Academy and several signifcant film writers tend to prefer deep but
cinematically boring films for their ballots.) It's directed by Jonathan
Demme, who won an Academy Award for his direction in SILENCE OF THE
LAMBS. The script is written by Akosua Busia, who wrote the energetic
segregation tale ROSEWOOD, and it's is based on the Pulitzer
Prize-winning novel by Toni Morrison. Finally, the two top-billed
actors, Oprah Winfrey and Danny Glover, have respectable if not
excellent track records in Hollywood. For all of these ingredients, a
very engaging motion picture experience is surely not unreasonable. 
The results are quite the opposite. BELOVED is a three-hour long movie
which lacks anything substantial to power it through such an unlikely
length. Demme and Busia have chosen faithfulness to the novel over basic
principles of filmmaking, and in doing so they deep-six any chances the
movie has for widespread appeal. Herein lies the story of Sethe
(Winfrey) an ex-slave living in post-Civil War Cincinnati. For her, the
year 1873 sees the arrival of friend from the past and soon-to-be-lover
Paul D (Glover). Although Sethe agrees with Paul D's presence in her
household, her daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise) does not. Not long after
Paul D comes to stay with Sethe and Denver do we see the entrance of
Beloved, a strange and sometimes horrific young woman who may or may not
be the reincarnation of a daughter Sethe once had. Sethe and Denver are
enchanted with her, but Paul D knows there's something not right and so
he departs for parts unknown while the plot escalates to its climax. 
And the climax cannot come soon enough. Both 1997 and 1998 have seen the
advent of several movies which push the envelope in terms of running
time, and only those films which have some sort of continual motion will
survive at such an extended duration. Anything which takes the better
part of three hours cannot simply rely on solid acting or tidbits of
tension, as in BELOVED. For therein lies the chief reason for the
disappointing outcome of the movie: although Winfrey and Glover give
outstanding performances, there is nothing here that we haven't seen
between AMISTAD and ROSEWOOD - and those were certainly more watchable
films. The only thing that BELOVED has going for it are the hints of a
ghost story, which, sadly, are dropped without realization very early in
the movie. Although some viewers may find this an outstanding and very
memorable film, it is not a mainstream product; and in the end, that is
what mars what might have been a truly fine movie.

Author
Susan Granger
Leave it to the resourceful Oprah Winfrey to insure that at
least three, perhaps four, fine black actors will get Academy Award
nominations this year. In this adaptation of Toni Morrison's Pulitzer
Prize-winning novel about the devastating effects of slavery on an
African-American family, directed by Jonathan Demme ("Philadelphia"),
Oprah personifies terror and truth as Sethe, a former slave raising
her teenage daughter (Kimberly Elise) in rural Ohio circa 1873. She's
haunted by the horrors of her past and the ghost of her murdered baby,
plus the way the rest of her family (husband, two sons) have abandoned
her. After drifting around since emancipation, another former slave
(Danny Glover) shows up on her doorstep. They share a common
birthplace: a plantation called Sweet Home in Kentucky - except "It
wasn't sweet and it wasn't home." Then a strange, wild young woman
(Thandie Newton) appears. Covered with slime and filth, and talking
like the devil in "The Exorcist," she says her name is "Beloved."
Gradually, through flashbacks, the tortuous, interweaving background
story of these characters evolves. Like "Amistad" and "Rosewood," it
reveals the terrible truth about black history, prejudice, and man's
inhumanity to man. Unlike "The Color Purple," however, the audience is
kept emotionally distant.  Perhaps that's because the serious,
intelligent and deeply disturbing script is an assemblage of three
writers: Akosua Busia (soon-to-be ex-wife of director John Singleton),
Richard LaGravenese ("Bridges of Madison County"), and Adam Brooks
("French Kiss"). On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Beloved" is a
stately, artistically admirable 9 - but recommended only for those who
are willing to undergo three long, stolid hours of unrelenting misery.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

BELOVED (director: Jonathan Demme; cast: Oprah Winfrey (Sethe), Danny
Glover (Paul D), Thandie Newton(Beloved), Kimberly Elise (Denver), Beah
Richards (Baby Suggs), Lisa
Gay Hamilton (Younger Sethe), Albert Hall (Stamp Paid), Irma P.
Hal(Ella) and Carol Jean Lewis (Janey Wagon), 1998)
An excrutiatingly long (the film runs 174 minutes) adaptation of
Pulitizer Prize winning author Toni Morrison's book, based on the true
story of runaway slave Margaret Garner. The film version centers around
the psychological problems a former single parent slave named Sethe
(Oprah) has, as she tries to live her life as a free person. I have not
read the book, but as others who read the book have commented, this is a
very difficult work to bring to film because the author's words are so
literary imaginative and poetic, such works have in the past resulted in
poorly shot films. That is not the case here. Toni Morrison has said,
that she is very pleased with the outcome of the film. Demme has sort of
solved the literary problem by making this film into a ghost story, as
the strong visualizations are used as metaphors for the inhumanity of
slavery and the lasting impressions it stamps on the minds of the
victims. There can be no doubt of how brutal a system slavery is; and
Demme uses images, such as a dog having his eyes gauged out and
subliminally invective flashbacks of slaves being hung and whipped, to
point out the psychological scars that remain upon the people who lived
through this very dark period of America's history. And these scars and
hatreds of that period are still with present day America, as it
wrestles with its past and the deep racial divisions it has created.
The frightening and intense emotional mood this film sets is appropriate
for the seriousness of the issues it brings to the table, and the
deprivation it causes in the country cannot be minimized in any degree,
which it isn't here. This is an honest picture, ever faithful to the
book's author and the subject matter. But there were definite flaws in
this film that detracted from it, such as the poor editing and pace of
the film. The first and middle parts of the film dragged on for too
long, as it just failed to hold one's attention to the story for long
periods of time; and, it was, also, shot, for the most part, in shadowy
night colors making the dark screen unpleasant to watch.
What was emotionally moving about the film, were its very striking
visualizations, such as the use of the haunted house to make certain
that slavery is understood as a haunting experience, that stays with
people who experienced it, and that its ills may be deemed permanent for
those who can't exorcize the demons slavery has thrust onto the land.
The haunted house is scary, its apparition of the baby that Sethe
(Oprah) had killed rather than return her to slavery in Sweet Home,
indicates how the hope for the Negro is in the new generation, the old
can just hope to survive and be free. The ghost scenes in Sethe's house
were strong enough messages to scare away any company she might want to
have.
But I was not crazy about the casting of Oprah in the major role of the
film, she was certainly adequate for the part (there was a stoic
strength about her that was needed in her performance, and she provided
that), but she did not show a deep enough range of emotions that a more
accomplished actress would have shown. When Danny Glover (Paul D.), was
on screen, the film had an electricity to it, but when Oprah was on
screen without him, the film lagged.
When reminiscing with Sethe about their slave days at Sweet Home, Paul
D. has this great line to sum up his slave days, "It was not sweet and
it was not home."
The strength of the film lies in the energy it picks up in its final
scenes, as the story clearly came together, and all the images
throughout the film began to add up and make sense, and it was able to
leave an indelible mark on the viewer that lasts long after seeing the
film, in fact, the film gets better when you start thinking about it
long after you have seen the film, and only unique, visionary pictures
are capable of doing that.
The film opens, after showing the simple grave with only the word
"Beloved" marked on it. Sethe is living in an old broken down house in
the outskirts of Cincinnatti, in 1873, eight years after the Civil War
freed the slaves. She lives there with her teenage daughter Denver
(Kimberly), her two sons having run away from this haunted house and sad
life. Denver clings to Sethe, being too afraid to venture out of the
immediate area of the house by herself. That she evolves as the story
moves on and learns how to take care of herself, is one of the
refreshing surprises that comes about, as Kimberley's performance is
very gratifying and touching to behold, especially to see how she
matures and grows up from her very weak stature in life. She becomes the
real heroine of the story.
Sethe and Denver have learned to live with what they have when Paul D.
(Glover) shows up at their house. He has not seen her since they escaped
from slavery in Kentucky 18 years ago. He moves in and they become
family, but the ghost in the house becomes agitated by this and
reappears in an otherworldly girl named Beloved (Thandie), who is taken
in by Sethe. By having Beloved live with her, Sethe's contented life can
no longer be, and the bad memories resurface, as the ghost that is in
Beloved, is clearly the young girl Sethe once killed.
What unfolds, is the coming to grips with the spectre of slavery and the
misery it caused to Sethe as she is forced to relive the sin she has
done. Beloved's performance is eerie and painstaking, I wouldn't call it
a great performance, but it is gut-wrenching to watch how weird she
behaves, drooling and stuffing food in her mouth like an animal, as
Sethe doesn't know how to reach her and love her, yet feels remorseful
about her. She looks at her, as if she was her own daughter, so it is
not surprising when she says that she would do the same thing again if
she had to choose between slavery and a young girl's life. One of the
most powerful lines in the film is when the tender-skinned Beloved, who
would have been the same age as Sethe's Beloved if she were alive, says
to her, "Why you have me? Why you leave me?"
The other powerful woman in the story is Baby Suggs (Beah Richards), who
is Sethe's mother-in-law, a spiritual healer of the Negroes, whose
performance is only too brief in the film, she brings life to the film
that is in desperate need of revitalization during its many dull lapses.
But fortunately, Demme is able to show the natural beauty of where they
live and the warmth and strength of the Afro-Americans and their ability
to stick together to help one another in times of despair, this is
especially so with the women folk who turned to Jesus for strength, as
they are shown praying with Baby Suggs.
When Sethe is ready to face up to the realities and  misdeeds slavery
does to human beings, her vitality improves for awhile, as she exclaims
to Paul D, "feel how it feels to be a colored woman roaming the roads
with anything God made liable to jump on you. Feel that."
I still think that I should have read the book to really feel what
"that" is, even if the film was credible enough, I imagine the book is
that much more pertinent and that much more powerful than this very
interesting and intelligent film, that views slavery in an unforgettable
way, perhaps, in a way, that audiences have not visualized the evil
consequences of slavery before seeing this film.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
=A9 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Bob Bloom
 The film adaptation of Toni Morrison's Beloved is a haunting, poetic epic
that's part ghost story, part love story, part family drama.
 It's a powerful, eerie story that, quite frankly, those with a lack of or
little imagination will have difficulty following or understanding.
 Looming over this story is the abomination of slavery and the scars, both
physical and psychological, it has left on its victims.
 Set in rural Ohio in 1873, the movie tells of Sethe (Oprah Winfrey), her
daughter, Denver (Kimberly Elise), Sethe's lover, Paul D (Danny Glover),
and the strange, young woman (Thandie Newton) who enters their lives. She
calls herself Beloved.
 She is an otherworldly woman-child who appears on Sethe's doorstep covered
with insects and drooling like a baby.
 Sethe takes her into her home and into her heart for Sethe is haunted by a
dark and bloody secret - an infant daughter she killed to keep her and her
family from being returned to slavery.
 Is Beloved the spirit of that daughter? That is the mystery that intrigues
the audience.
 Beloved offers an opportunity for a strong ensemble of actresses to
demonstrate their talents. It is the richest interaction of women on screen
since the 1993 screen version of another best seller, Amy Tan's The Joy
Luck Club.
 First and foremost is Winfrey's Sethe. She is a fierce, yet enigmatic
individual, determined to make a life for herself and her family as free
individuals. The scars she carries, literally and figuratively, drive her
to try to protect her family from the ghosts of her past.
 Winfrey's superb performance should come as no surprise to those who
remember her remarkable film debut a decade ago in Steven Spielberg's film
version of Alice Walker's The Color Purple.
 Winfrey, who purchased the rights to Morrison's Pulitzer Prize-winning
novel about 10 years ago, has nurtured this project for a decade. She has
poured her heart and soul into Sethe, creating a woman of indomitable
fortitude.
 Newton has the showiest as well as the most difficult chore, bringing to
life the unearthly Beloved. At times Newton's performance comes very close
to an Exorcist-like parody, as she croaks, drools and hisses her way
through the script, flailing her arms and walking like a child who has just
mastered her first steps.
 She is demanding and dependent, childlike innocent and darkly demonic.
 Newton walks an acting tightrope with very few missteps. It is a brave and
daring performance.
 The high points of Beloved are those scenes featuring veteran performer
Beah Richards as Baby Suggs, Sethe's mother-in-law. She's a freed slave
turned preacher whose sermons are meant to lift the hearts and souls of a
newly freed people. Her sermon from atop a rock in which the men begin to
dance around her while the children laugh and the women wail is magical.
 Richards is an island of tenderness in a movie filled with some horrific
and brutal images.
 As Denver, Elise has the thankless task of allowing herself to be
overshadowed by the more flamboyant Newton. Yet as the film progresses,
Denver gains strength, resolve and backbone. She starts as someone needing
the protection of her mother and ends up an independent woman fighting to
save her mother's soul.
 Elise, with doe-like eyes and determined mouth, could pass as Winfrey's
daughter. This fine young actress probably delivers the most subtle and
strongest performance in the film.
 Glover brings humor and dignity to the role of Paul D. He's a good man
whose feet, as he says, have done a lot of walking since being freed. He
finds a home and works to make a life with Sethe, trying to help her
conquer the specters of her past.
 The bond that binds these two are Sweet Home, the ironic name of the
Kentucky plantation on which they were both slaves. The flashback scenes
showing the brutalization of the slaves are horrifying, yet somehow
disconcerting. Their tone seems more Mandingo and less Morrison.
Thankfully, Beloved only contains a few lurid flashbacks, not enough to
throw the film out of kilter.
 Director Jonathan Demme (Silence of the Lambs, Philadelphia) tells much of
his story in close-up, making Beloved an intimate experience between
character and audience, bringing the viewer into the lives of Sethe and her
family.
 Screenwriters Akosua Busia, Richard LeGravenese and Adam Brooks did a
masterful job of translating Morrison's sometime elliptical novel into
cinematic terms.
 Rachel Portman's uplifting score adds to the tenor of the film as does Tak
Fujimoto's brilliant cinematography.
 Beloved, at nearly three hours in length, is an outstanding film,
featuring Oscar-caliber performances from its leading players. It is a
literate endeavor, but one literal-minded people may not totally
appreciate. It is a film in which you must allow your imagination free
rein.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Victory Marasigan
Review by Victory A. Marasigan
http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~vmaras1/reviewsidx.html
Jonathan Demme's _Beloved_, based on the book Toni Morrison, is a
study in skillful literary adaptation. On the one hand, the film manages
to recreate key moments from the novel, evoking Morrison's pragmatic
narrative style without using her authorial voice. On the other hand,
Beloved omits the some of the finer details of the book, favoring an
ambiguously defined back story upon which to build the story's main
events. This choice is a smartly made one, for it creates an open space in
which the story's wide range of emotions can gestate and grow. Indeed, the
impact of the film is so protracted that much of it cannot be felt until
long after the end credits have rolled.
_Beloved_ takes place in the second half of the 19th century, during the
so-called Reconstruction Era after the Civil War. For newly-freed slaves,
it is a time of confusion and turmoil. Oprah Winfrey is Sethe, a slave who
escaped a Kentucky plantation and took her children to an Ohio farmhouse,
where she hoped the terror would end. What she did not know was that it
would follow her there, and remain with her long after the physical threat
had vanished. _Beloved_ ultimately tells the story of Sethe's search for
forgiveness, one long-hampered by an unforgettable sin. 
The film starts off on a dreary day ten years after Sethe's escape, as a
violent, unseen energy rocks her dilapidated farmhouse. Invisible hands
terrorize her family, flinging objects across rooms, shaking tables,
rattling floorboards. Sethe's sons run away, perhaps for good, leaving
Sethe and her daughter Denver to fend for themselves. 
Demme's matter-of-fact handling of this supernatural element is just one
of _Beloved_'s intriguing aspects. All of the characters take for granted
that ghosts are real. When Paul D (Danny Glover) -- a former slave who
escaped Kentucky along with Sethe -- arrives at the house eight years
later and is confronted with the ghost's hellish visions, he doesn't run
in terror. Instead, he asks who the ghost is. As in Morrison's novel,
Demme quickly establishes that the horror of the story will not come from
the fact of the ghost itself, but from the terrifying past in which the
ghost was created. Sethe is the one being haunted, but the ghost in the
house is the least of her fears. In fact, the ghost is one of the reasons
she chooses to stay. 
The story takes an bizarre turn with the appearance of Beloved (Thandie
Newton), a young black-clad woman who appears on Sethe's front lawn,
leaned Christ-like against a tree stump. Sethe and Denver immediately
take to the rasping woman and try to nurse her to health. They know not
who she is, but that doesn't matter. Only Paul D is suspicious of the
stranger. Little does the family know that Beloved will bring about many
changes, and force Sethe to release a guilt she has held onto so urgently
for eighteen years. 
Winfrey is arguably Beloved's greatest asset. She inhabits the role of
Sethe so convincingly it is hard to believe this is the same woman who
shines brightly on a TV talk show. Lisa Gay Hamilton does an impressive
job in the emotionally demanding role as the younger Sethe, whose
appalling actions make her the disturbed woman we see eighteen years
later. Danny Glover is affable as the sympathetic Paul D, as is Kimberly
Elise as Denver, Sethe's wanderlusting daughter. As Sethe's sage-like
mother-in-law Old Baby Suggs, Beah Richards authoritatively commands every
scene in which she appears.
The film's least palatable choice of casting is unfortunately that of the
role of Beloved herself. Thandie Newton plays the glassy-eyed girl with a
demented fervor which is endearing at first, but which becomes off-putting
and unintentionally laughable by the end. 
Departing from the honed aesthetic he used in such films as _The Silence
of the Lambs_ and _Melvin & Howard_, director Demme has used a bit of
dramatic overstatement to get across the vivid descriptions in Morrison's
novel. Totemic camera shots and color-saturated scenery are decidedly
uncommon in Demme's films, but the few he uses here work to the film's
benefit.  _Beloved_'s most memorable scenes are those of Baby Suggs'
gatherings in a forest clearing, where the bright yellow-greens of nature
entrance the viewer as much as Suggs' words do.
For the most part, though, Demme maintains his trademark directorial
neutrality.  This, combined with Morrison's equally frugal method of
storytelling, may make _Beloved_ somewhat of a challenge to watch, even to
those familiar with the book.  Though the film compliments the book
extraordinarily well, it falls short in allowing the sort of accessibility
one usually expects from a film.  Nothing is spoon-fed to the viewer. 
Morrison's novel is just as enigmatic, but unlike a movie, a book can be
put down to allow the various undercurrents and themes to churn and
absorb.
The movie begins like _Poltergeist_, and ends like _The Color Purple_,
with shades of _The Scarlet Letter_ and _Little Women_ somewhere in the
middle. Taken as a whole, Beloved is a disquieting, one-of-a-kind
experience, one to be viewed with guards down and spirits in abeyance.

Author
Mark O'Hara
In her 1988 novel Beloved, Toni Morrison mints the word "rememory."  
Although Jonathan Demme's film does not make use of the word, its 
connections are there, reminding us that memories are what we're made 
of;  more insistently, they are what we cannot escape from.
The film stands as a personal history of pain inflicted by slavery and 
by hatred built against blacks during the Reconstruction era.  The 
product is part romance, part ghost tale, part indictment of American 
society 100 years after some of its citizens declared themselves free.  
The person at the center is Sethe (pronounced SET-ta and played by Oprah 
Winfrey).  We meet her and what's left of her family in 1865, just a few 
years after their traumatic flight from slavery.  Her children include 
boys Howard and Buglar, their younger sister Denver and, disturbingly, 
the menacing ghost of another daughter, Beloved.  Until the time of her 
death as an infant, the baby had been called "crawling already?".  Now, 
in the 1870's, Beloved is terrorizing the family, injuring the dog "Here 
Boy" and causing her brothers to stuff a rucksack full of food and run 
off.
Almost as unsettling as the flashback in which the baby dies, the scenes 
of her poltergeist-like violence grip the viewer.  Demme directs them 
with a rapid pace.  It's a relief that they end only a few minutes into 
the film, when Paul D (Danny Glover) enters and puts up an angry 
resistance.  The kitchen has been destroyed (in the book it takes Paul 
weeks to mend the furniture) but the manifestations are apparently gone.  
Despite resentment from Denver (Kimberly Elise), Paul D stays and 
develops a relationship with Sethe.  His presence is like a redemption 
after 18 years of wandering and fleeing and witnessing the degradation 
of other blacks.  Perhaps Paul's romance with Sethe begins through their 
common ties: they were owned by a brutal Kentuckian known as 
"schoolteacher"; but the most peaceful time in the film follows the two 
old friends' falling in love.
It's been ten years since the first stages of the film's production - 
since the book won Morrison the Pulitzer (later she received the Nobel 
Prize in Literature, the first African American woman so recognized).  
As one of the producers, Winfrey no doubt had strong creative control.  
One of the results is the brilliant casting.  First, Winfrey herself 
sketches Sethe with a character and strength that is almost 
indestructible.  Her role in The Color Purple showed us her canny and 
solid screen presence, and this film makes us realize the scarcity of 
her roles since.  Winfrey endows Sethe with just the right ways, her 
stares knowing, her gestures purposeful, her words picked to both assert 
and guard her spirit.  In a scene outside the restaurant where she 
works, Sethe is flattered that Paul has come to pick her up.  Instantly 
her expression turns to consternation when she suspects Paul will 
announce he is leaving her, and just as easily she beams when Paul says, 
"I want you pregnant!"  The face of a lesser actress could not 
accomplish such a range.
As the title character, Thandie Newton delivers a startling performance.  
>From the time she tramps out of a creek, dressed in dark colors and new 
shoes, and collapses on the bank to sleep, she lends a creepy presence 
to the story.  Beetles engulf her as we hear the rasp of her snore.  
Later she turns up in front of Sethe's house, propped scarecrow-like --  
a turning point.  What is not clear is why Sethe does not realize that 
here is a living wraith, the incarnation of the child that previously 
haunted the house and their lives, making them a family of outcasts even 
among blacks.  The young woman - she appears as the age she would be in 
life - croaks out the letters in her name, but it is not until later 
that Sethe's daughter Denver realizes the stranger's identity.  In her 
portrayal of Beloved, Newton is appropriately clumsy and regressive in 
speech: she's reminiscent of those who have been aroused from a coma and 
act much less than their age.
After seeing Danny Glover as Paul D. Garner, it's hard to imagine any 
other actor in the role.  He brings a veteran instinct that telegraphs 
the story's direction clearly.  At times gentle, swaggering, aggressive, 
disillusioned, Paul D leaves his mark as a man who cares and who accepts 
the responsibilities he lays out for himself.  Because Paul is so 
straightforward and strong, we are all the more disheartened when the 
creature from beyond his world mesmerizes him.  Is Beloved carrying out 
a sort of revenge for Paul's ousting her possessive spirit?  Among the 
most riveting patterns in the plot are the scenes in which Paul finds 
himself repulsed by sleeping in Sethe's room; he moves to a rocking 
chair to an empty bed in a spare room, to a shed across the back field.  
It's here that we see the consummation of the second hellish scene to 
take place in the shed. 
Baby Suggs is one of Toni Morrison's most memorable characters.  She is 
the mother of Halle, one of the Sweet Home slaves owned by Mr. Garner.  
Halle has worked extra to buy his mother and send her north, across the 
Ohio River to Cincinnati.  Morrison is masterful in showing how 
slaveowners were oblivious to the humanity of their captives.  Even 
though he is one of the more humane owners, Garner is not aware of Baby 
Suggs' name; he calls her "Jenny Whitlow" from her original sale papers.  
In the film, Beah Richards achieves the right status of nurturerer and 
prophet.  Grandma Baby, Sethe's mother-in-law and Denver's grandmother, 
preaches atop a rock in the woods, bringing her listeners wisdom and 
hope.  She is called "holy" in the book, and proved so in the film.  
"Love your flesh" and "Kiss your hands," she intones, and we see more of 
the body imagery that spreads throughout the work.  
As Denver, Kimberly Elise also shows a variety of moods.  Hateful toward 
Paul D, protective of her reclaimed big sister, finally mature at the 
end, Denver's story ends happily.  In a namesake role - Amy Denver, who 
delivers Sethe's child beneath the surface of the Ohio (again, water 
images) - Kessia Randall is perfectly talkative and compassionate.  And 
as Stamp Paid - another of Morrison's wonderful names - Albert Hall 
plays well as an ex-slave who delivers Sethe to Baby, and who later 
delivers a revelation to Paul D.
Because Morrison's novel is not a linear narrative, the film resorts to 
a risky series of flashbacks.  These slices of past lives, many of them 
disconcerting in their depiction of abuse and murder, are shot in grainy 
and incandescent tones, helping us to distinguish them from the main 
plotline.  Even though some of the scenes resemble bad videotape, the 
craftsmanship of storytelling has to be admired.  The soundtrack is also 
remarkable, made up of period instruments, voices, and curiously 
effective sounds of insects and birds.
The film's astonishing content does not quite fill its nearly three 
hours.  Editing down the last quarter of the story would have made for 
tighter composition.  No matter how riveting the story, viewers have 
time to look at their watches, an indication of a saggy pace.
Why the filmmakers shot the bulk of the film around Philadelphia instead 
of Cincinnati, I don't know.  The city locations grab our eyes, after so 
much of the story is told around Sethe's farmhouse.  Names like 
"Shillito's", an early Cincinnati department store, show the attention 
to detail paid by the set designers.  We are treated to vistas of the 
muddy Ohio, the distant sky beclouded by industrial smoke.  A hog 
capital before Chicago, Cincinnati is seen as a typical heartland town.  
Very appropriate, considering Morrison adapted a story that appeared in 
the January 29 and 30 editions of the Cincinnati Enquirer.  The model 
for Sethe was Margaret Garner, a 23 year-old who joined fugitive slaves 
from two farms south of Covington, Kentucky.  The real-life Stamp Paid 
was probably Elijah Kite, an ex-slave who assisted in the Underground 
Railroad.  The Bodwins are given a brief part in the film;  their 
counterpart was Levi Coffin, a Quaker storeowner who was the "president" 
of the Railroad.  Morrison also preserves the number of Margaret's 
children:  Samuel, 5, Thomas, 6, Mary, 3 (the ill-fated Beloved in the 
book), and Silla, a 3 month-old boy.  The Garners' owner was Archibald 
Gaines, part of the dreaded posse that tracked them down.
Considering how important it is to know one's history, it would be good 
if every American citizen were to see Beloved.  Whereas so many films 
are useless, Beloved proves itself a useful part of our culture.  For 
those interested in researching their ancestry, it is difficult to find 
information farther back than a few generations.  How infinitely more 
difficult to discover the identity of relations who were slaves.  
Beloved is also important as a genealogical study of pain and healing.


Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Director Jonathan Demme's vision of slavery and the memories contained
in its after life in 'Beloved', based on Toni Morrison's novel are
haunting to say the least.  Demme is a brilliant director.  I'm hard
pressed to find a more chilling example of intense psychological drama
when I think about the confrontation between Hannibal Lecter and Dr.
Chilton in 1991's 'The Silence of the Lambs' when Lecter focuses on the
doctor's pen as a tool in part to release himself from handcuffs later
in the film.  The way the camera followed Lecter's expression cutting
back and fourth from his face to the pen was so simple that it was hard
to believe.  Demme uses some of his psychological tricks in a similar
and unsettling way in his latest film.
In 'Beloved', Oprah Winfrey portrays Sethe, a former slave from a
Kentucky plantation who is now living on the outskirts of Cincinnati,
Ohio in 1865.  As the film opens, we are shown the full blooded makings
of what is in part is a ghost story.  The events are open to individual
interpretation.  Is the tiny farm house owned by Sethe actually haunted
or is it the horrible memories in the mind of a former slave brought up
from time to time?  At least that's the way I saw it.  Eight years
pass.  It is now 1873.  Sethe lives with her daughter Denver (Kimberly
Elise) and one calm afternoon, Paul D (Danny Glover) shows up and
rekindles his memories of the past (he is also a former slave) with
Sethe.  The two of them worked together on the same plantation and they
discuss events and realize that it's been 18 years since they last saw
each other.
Paul D moves in with the family and adjusts to the day to day life with
Sethe and Denver.  One day, after returning from a town carnival, the
three of them find a destitute young woman (Thandie Newton) who appears
to suffer from mental instability and sheer psychological trauma.  She
says her name is Beloved, and is taken in by the family.  For the
benefit of those of you who don't want the film spoiled, I will not
explain much more about the relationship between Beloved and the rest of
the family except to say that the outcome of her presence in the film
will leave you open to interpret it in your own way, much in the same
way the ghost story overtones are open to the same individual
interpretation early in the film.
Like any good story that gives meaning to the purpose of its characters,
'Beloved' takes movie audiences on a journey to the past and gives its
story a hard-core amount of depth with memories of the past from its
main characters, detailing the torturous aspects of slavery as one of
the most terrible historical events in human history.  It's story hasn't
been told enough and while this film does examine its aspects only in
flashbacks, it is an ample amount of education without being over done.
The performances in 'Beloved' are exceptionally strong and sympathetic
in and of themselves without robbing the characters brought to life of
what pride and dignity remain in their lives without being overly
sentimental.  Oprah Winfrey's performance IS the best one so far in 1998
by an actress and although Danny Glover is clearly seen in this film as
a supporting actor, I hope he earns a long deserved Oscar nomination for
his work on this film and Winfrey will enjoy her second Oscar nomination
if nominated for this film.  Her last Oscar nomination came in 1985 for
Best Supporting Actress in 'The Color Purple'.
Unsettling?  Yes.  Weepy and sentimental?  No.  Intelligent and
inspiring?  Definitely.  Those in search of light entertainment:
beware.  'Beloved' will stay in your memory for days after you see it
and isn't for those who like to forget about a movie a couple of hours
after they've witnessed it.  Oscar nominations are coming.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on Halloween 1998 by myself at the SONY Loews Orpheum for $8.75
One of the rules by which I judge a screen adaptation i that the director
make sure the movie stands on its own merits, and not the novels from
which they are derived.
Oprah Winfrey has touted *Beloved* as a *Schindler's List* for
African-Americans. It fails where the other succeeds. To understand the
horrors of the Holocaust, they were shown. In *Beloved*, the horrors of
slavery are not shown as often as they are referenced in many flashbacks.
Much more time is spent being horrified by the past, which is unveiled in
a slow, plodding manner that stalls in the metaphysical mishmash of it's
presentation.
The storyline jumps around: It opens in 1855 with the haunting of a black
family in Ohio. A deadly ghost is present. Then, the story jumps ahead to
eight years in the future, where Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) lives in isolation
with her daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise) when Paul D (Danny Glover)
arrives from out of nowhere. He is a fellow former slave from "Sweet
Home"--the plantation where he and Sethe once toiled. Why they almost
immediately have sex is inexplicable, as are many elements of this
ultimately disappointing film.
Out of the bogswamp arrives Beloved (Thandie Newton), who is either
fashioned by insects or just very at home with nature. She cannot talk and
is a mystery to the entire family, but she becomes a (strange) part of the
family--a sister for the lonely Denver, and a replacement daughter for
Sethe's lost infant. But sibling rivalries flare up as Beloved gravitates
to Sethe, only to torment her.
Meanwhile, there are lots of flashbacks. Lots and lots of them. Maybe too
many? The most interesting is the story of a pregnant younger Sethe (well
played by Lisa Gay Hamilton, who looks *nothing* like Oprah's Sethe)
escaping the horrors (sexual abuse and the lynching of Sethe's mother) of
"Sweet Home" to go north to Ohio. She is befriended by a white woman (Amy
Denver, played by Kessia Randall) who helps her give birth and make it to
the home of her mother-in-law Baby Suggs (Beah Richards).
Jonathan Demme's direction cannot help the "stream of unconciousness" of
Toni Morrison's novel, which in turn is problematic. It took three writers
to adapt the screenplay. But Demme does some strange things along the way.
Clouds zip by in fast motion... why? There are some wonderful lingering
shots of the natural surroundings, and the most visually compelling scene
is the one in which Baby Suggs preaches to folks in the woods. Demme
bathes here in an overexposure that makes her golden.
Meanwhile, Beloved (in an outstanding performance by Newton) spins out of
control, eating everything with two hands balled into fists, and running
around naked. Please don't ask why--I don't know. Maybe Oprah knows.
Unlike *Schindler's List*, *Beloved* is just a psychodrama on acid, that
fails to systematically explain slavery's horrors in a way that is
accessible. Too much is expected of the viewer; we are expected to know
historical conditions and the novel. A movie featuring characters named
Schoolteacher, Buglar, Running Boy, Stamp Paid, and the Thirty Women
should have been lyrical, haunting, poetic.  Instead, it's a thematic mess
that takes translates every aspect of the book with no explanation. Who
are the Thirty Women anyway? Why include them and not explain them?
What would have been a *fantastic* movie would have been to delve into the
relationship between Denver and her grandmother, the spiritual
preacherwoman Baby Suggs. The story unwisely centers on crazy Sethe when
the real gold lies in Denver's neglect, and her ability to rise above the
insanity of her upbringing and persevere.
Oh, and the movie's too long. But the music was nice.
Oprah Winfrey is one of the producers, and she plugged it endlessly to her
loyal audience, saying how the movie "changed people's lives." I mean no
disrespect to the Black experience in panning this movie. There are so
many other better movies and plays--*Roots*, *Queen*, *The Autobiography
of Miss Jane Pittman*, *The Piano Lesson*, etc. And there might be an even
better one out there yet to depict the legacy of slavery, but in narrative
form, as PBS's *Africans in America: America's Journey Through Slavery*
took the documentary route.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Michael Dequina
Jonathan Demme's _Beloved_, based on Toni Morrison's Pulitzer
Prize-winning novel of the same name, is a movie of moments--moments of
raw, lyrical emotional power scattered over a nearly three-hour time
expanse.  While the extended running time does little to dilute the potency
of these isolated moments, it does, however, blunt the dramatic urgency of
the assembled story.  Instead of cutting deep into the heart, _Beloved_
pierces the heart; the film is indeed moving, but lacking the momentum to
make a sweeping emotional impact.
_Beloved_ is named after a character in the story, a mysterious young
woman (Thandie Newton) who shows up in the yard of Sethe (Oprah Winfrey)
one morning in 1873.  Sethe is a runaway slave trying to provide a decent
living for herself and her daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise) on the
outskirts of Cleveland, Ohio.  With the arrival of old friend Paul D (Danny
Glover) and, later, the childlike Beloved (whom she takes in), Sethe's life
appears to be taking a turn for the better, but the secrets of her tortured
past refuse to rest in peace.
It is my understanding that the screenplay, credited to Akosua Busia,
Richard LaGravenese, and Adam Brooks, is remarkably faithful to Morrison's
narrative structure.  In theory, fidelity to source material is a good
thing, but it does not completely work here.  Often, watching _Beloved_
feels like reading a book--a good thing if one is indeed reading, but not
necessarily what one is looking for when watching a film.  Although the
basics of Morrison's story and her characters are compelling, not much
really _happens_--at least not enough to sustain the 172-minute running
time.  As such, the memorable moments--and there are quite a number of
powerful ones, particularly some harrowing, hard-to-watch flashbacks of the
young Sethe's (Lisa Gay Hamilton) horrific past--are a bit too widespread
to make an assembled effect.  Any emotional response to any given moment
exists independently of any other.
Still, I must give Demme and the writers credit for the risks they take.
In duplicating Morrison's timeline-jumping structure, they demand an
inordinant amount of concentration from the viewer, and very few films
present such a fascinating challenge.  And while the structure and stately
pace work against the building of narrative momentum, they create a
haunting--or, rather, _haunted_--atmosphere.  Most of the key action in
_Beloved_ takes place in the past, and the film makes an uncanny
duplication of the seemingly cyclical nature of memories in one's mind,
revealing its secrets little by little, fragment by fragment, leaving
certain events only to retrace and expand on them later.  Granted, this
technique makes a lot of the action hard to follow, sometimes frustratingly
so, but it creates a feeling that is rich and unique.  Also unique is how
Demme isn't afraid to show the grimy nature of life in the time period;
instead of giving everything a shiny Hollywood sheen, the dirt and grit is
always there, on the sets and even the actors.
Also extending to the cast is this element of risk.  Taking the most
chances is Newton, who delivers a raw, unpredictable performance.  Called
upon to bare body and soul, adopt maladroit body movements and slurred
speech rhythms, she could have easily come off as ridiculously overwrought
and alien, but her soulful eyes consistently project a tempering humanity.
Not to be outdone, of course, is Winfrey.  People forget that before she
became a daytime TV phenomenon, she first made a name of herself as an
Oscar-nominated actress (for _The_Color_Purple_), and her work here is
restrained and, as such, the more emotionally honest; the same goes for
Glover.  But the standout performer is the one who will likely be the most
overlooked--Elise.  She doesn't have a role as literally showy as Newton's,
nor does she have the star power of a Winfrey or Glover, but she
is_Beloved_'s steadying force.  Denver has the most dramatic evolution out
of all the characters (from shut-in to independent woman), yet remains the
most stable; the key is to not play the change as if it were dramatic but
natural.  Elise's performance is so natural that it is easy to forget she
is an actress playing a part.
_Beloved_ is a wearying film, and that comment should be interpreted in
all the ways it can be.  On the positive side, the filmmakers so
successfully create the intended air of melancholy that it is daunting.
But on the negative end, one cannot help but feel exhausted, emotionally
and physically, after three slow hours.  Similarly, by that time the film
is also exhausted.  I was indeed be moved by _Beloved_, but in the end,
there wasn't enough momentum left to truly sweep me away, as it should have.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
